Louisiana, session 2026, HB158.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Code of Criminal Procedure Article 900(A)(6)(b) is hereby amended and
reenacted to read as follows:
Art. 900. Violation hearing; sanctions
A.
* * *
(6)
* * *
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Subparagraph (5) of this Paragraph,
any defendant who has been placed on probation by the court for the conviction of
an offense other than a crime of violence as defined in R.S. 14:2(B) or of a sex
offense as defined by R.S. 15:541, and who has been determined by the court to have
committed a technical violation of his probation, may be required to serve a sentence
of not more than ninety days without diminution of sentence. If the sentence is to
be served in a custodial substance abuse treatment program, the defendant may be
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 158 ENROLLED
required to serve a sentence of not more than one hundred eighty days without
diminution of sentence.
* * *
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.